Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 18
RAIL FIXED GUIDEWAY SYSTEM SAFETY OVERSIGHT

Section

40-18-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 18, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Commission" means the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado.

"Rail fixed guideway system" means any light, heavy, or rapid rail system, monorail, inclined plane, funicular, trolley, or automated guideway used to transport passengers that is not regulated by the federal railroad administration. The term "rail fixed guideway system" does not include funiculars that are passenger tramways as defined in section 12-150-103 (5)(c) and are subject to the jurisdiction of the Colorado passenger tramway safety board created in section 12-150-104.

"System safety program plan" means a document adopted by a transit agency that details its safety policies, objectives, responsibilities, and procedures.

"System safety program standard" means a safety standard developed by the commission in conformance with 49 CFR 659, "Rail Fixed Guideway Systems; State Safety Oversight".

"Transit agency" means an entity operating a rail fixed guideway system.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 930, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

(1) repealed, p. 1807, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP and (3) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1733, § 259, effective October 1.

40-18-102. Rail fixed guideway system safety oversight program - commission may establish.

The commission is authorized to establish an oversight program for the safety and security of rail fixed guideway systems in accordance with section 28 of the "Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5330, and the "Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5329.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 931, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1103), ch. 96, p. 310, § 2, effective August 7.

40-18-103. Commission to promulgate rules.

The commission shall promulgate rules as are necessary to:

Require, review, approve, and monitor the creation and implementation of a system safety program plan for each rail fixed guideway system operating in Colorado;

Investigate hazardous conditions and accidents on rail fixed guideway systems;

Require corrective action by a transit agency to correct or eliminate hazardous conditions;

Require that system safety program standards comply with the requirements of 49 CFR 659, "Rail Fixed Guideway Systems; State Safety Oversight", at a minimum, and also adequately address the issue of personal security.

The commission shall promulgate rules to establish a system safety oversight program for rail fixed guideway systems operating within the state that, at a minimum, meets the requirements of 49 CFR 659, "Rail Fixed Guideway Systems; State Safety Oversight".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 931, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1807, § 32, effective July 1.

40-18-104. Confidential investigative reports.

Investigative reports of the commission compiled under this article shall be confidential and shall not be discoverable nor used as evidence in any court or administrative action.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 931, § 1, effective August 6.

40-18-105. Calculation and assessment of fees.

Repealed.

At each regular session, the general assembly shall determine the amounts to be expended by the commission from the public utilities commission fixed utility fund created in section 40-2-114 for its administrative expenses under this article, including any additional FTE that may be necessary.

The director of the public utilities commission shall provide written notice to the revisor of statutes once the federal grant moneys made available under the "Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5329, have been awarded to the state. This subsection (2) takes effect upon the receipt by the revisor of statutes of such written notice.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 931, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1103), ch. 96, p. 310, § 3, effective August 7.